apertium-hbs.hbs.metadix
    <pardef n="for/ma__n"><!--Fleeting a --><!--The -i genitive plural preferred-->
      <e><p><l>ma</l><r>ma<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>me</l><r>ma<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mu</l><r>ma<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mi</l><r>ma<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mi</l><r>ma<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mo</l><r>ma<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mom</l><r>ma<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>me</l><r>ma<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>me</l><r>ma<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>me</l><r>ma<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mi</l><r>ma<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ma</l><r>ma<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>mâ</l><r>ma<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>amâ</l><r>ma<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ama</l><r>ma<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mama</l><r>ma<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mama</l><r>ma<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mama</l><r>ma<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bilje/ška__n"><!--With and without sibilarization --><!--Fleeting a --><!--Three possibilities for genitive pl-->
      <e><p><l>ška</l><r>ška<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ške</l><r>ška<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>šku</l><r>ška<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>šci</l><r>ška<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ški</l><r>ška<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>šci</l><r>ška<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ški</l><r>ška<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ško</l><r>ška<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>škom</l><r>ška<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ške</l><r>ška<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ške</l><r>ška<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ške</l><r>ška<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ški</l><r>ška<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ška</l><r>ška<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>škâ</l><r>ška<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>žakâ</l><r>ška<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žaka</l><r>ška<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>škama</l><r>ška<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>škama</l><r>ška<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>škama</l><r>ška<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="zi/pka__n"><!--With and without sibilarization --><!--Fleeting a --><!--Three possibilities for genitive pl--><!--consonant shift in plural-->
      <e><p><l>pka</l><r>pka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>pke</l><r>pka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>pku</l><r>pka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>šci</l><r>pka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>pki</l><r>pka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>šci</l><r>pka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>pki</l><r>pka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>pko</l><r>pka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>pkom</l><r>pka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>pke</l><r>pka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>pke</l><r>pka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>pke</l><r>pka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>pki</l><r>pka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>pka</l><r>pka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>pkâ</l><r>pka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>bakâ</l><r>pka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>baka</l><r>pka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>pkama</l><r>pka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>pkama</l><r>pka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>pkama</l><r>pka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pripovije/tka__n"><!--With and without sibilarization --><!--Fleeting a --><!--Three possibilities for genitive pl--><!--consonant shift in plural-->
      <e><p><l>tka</l><r>tka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tke</l><r>tka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tku</l><r>tka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>šci</l><r>tka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tki</l><r>tka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>šci</l><r>tka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tki</l><r>tka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tko</l><r>tka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tkom</l><r>tka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tke</l><r>tka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tke</l><r>tka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tke</l><r>tka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>tki</l><r>tka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>tka</l><r>tka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>tkâ</l><r>tka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>dakâ</l><r>tka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>daka</l><r>tka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tkama</l><r>tka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tkama</l><r>tka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tkama</l><r>tka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="bilješka"><i>bilje</i><par n="bilje/ška__n"/></e>
    <e lm="firma"><i>fir</i><par n="for/ma__n"/></e>
    <e lm="forma"><i>for</i><par n="for/ma__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zagonetka"><i>zagone</i><par n="pripovije/tka__n"/></e>
